Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.305

Emergency medical services—Study—Report.

(1) The Washington state institute for public policy, in collaboration with the department, the health care authority, and the office of the insurance commissioner, shall conduct a study on the extent to which other states fund or have considered funding emergency medical services substantially or entirely through federal, state, or local governmental funding and the current landscape of emergency medical services in Washington.

(2) The institute shall consider the following elements in conducting the study:

(a) Trends in the number and types of emergency medical services available and the volume of 911 responses and interfacility transports provided by emergency medical services organizations over time and by county in Washington state;

(b) Projections of the need for emergency medical services in Washington state counties over the next two years;

(c) Examination of geographic disparities in emergency medical services access and average response times, including identification of geographic areas in Washington state without access to emergency medical services within an average 25-minute response time;

(d) Estimates for the cost to address gaps in emergency medical services so all parts of the state are assured a timely response;

(e) Models for funding emergency medical services that are used by other states; and

(f) Existing research and literature related to funding models for emergency medical services.

(3) In conducting the study, the institute shall consult with emergency medical services organizations, local governmental entities, hospitals, labor organizations representing emergency medical services personnel, and other interested entities as determined by the institute in consultation with the department, the health care authority, and the office of the insurance commissioner.

(4) A report detailing the results of the study must be submitted to the department and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on or before June 1, 2026.

[ 2024 c 218 s 14.]